Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1296
Acquisition of salvage motorboat
without salvage branded certificate of title; duties.

Any
person who acquires ownership of a salvage motorboat, for which he or she
does not obtain a salvage branded certificate of title, shall surrender the
certificate of title to the county treasurer and make application
for a salvage branded certificate of title within thirty days after acquisition
or prior to the sale or resale of the motorboat or any major component part
of such motorboat or use of any major component part of the motorboat, whichever
occurs earlier.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 27.